District of Columbia statutes.
9-201.01

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter the term:

(1)

“Alley” means any public alley, as recorded in the records of the Office of the Surveyor, from its intersection with a street or another alley to its next intersection with a street or alley, or where it dead-ends.

(2)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(2A)

“DDOT” means the District Department of Transportation.

(3)

“District” means the District of Columbia government.

(4)

“Highway plan” means the plan of the permanent system of highways developed pursuant to § 9-103.01 et seq.

(5)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia, or the Mayor’s designated representative.

(6)

“Owner” means the owner(s) of record as shown on the records in the Department of Finance and Revenue.

(7)

“Street” means any public right-of-way, recorded as a street, road, or highway in the records of the Office of the Surveyor.

(8)

“Surveyor” means the Surveyor of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 101, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 18, 43 DCR 530
Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-246, § 2(a), 55 DCR 9010

Cross References

Surveyor of the District of Columbia, duties, see § 1-1301 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-411.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-246 added par. (2A).

References in Text

Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.